Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB472.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 118.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 118.155, any person who is qualified under the
provisions of KRS 116.055 to vote in any primary for the candidates for nomination
by the party at whose hands he or she seeks the nomination, shall have his or her
name printed on the official ballot of his or her party for an office to which he or
she is eligible in that primary, upon filing, with the Secretary of State or county
clerk, as appropriate, at the proper time, a notification and declaration.
(2) The notification and declaration shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board
of Elections. It shall be signed by the candidate, but the candidate's signature[ and
by not less than two (2) registered voters of the same party from the district or
jurisdiction from which the candidate seeks nomination. Signatures for nomination
papers] shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday
after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the
office will appear on the ballot. The notification and declaration for a candidate
shall include the following oath:
"For the purpose of having my name placed on the official primary election
ballot as a candidate for nomination by the ------ Party, I, ------ (name in full as
desired on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.129), do solemnly swear that my
residence address is ----- (street, route, highway, city if applicable, county, state,
and zip code), that my mailing address, if different, is ----- (post office address), and
that I am a registered ------ (party) voter; that I believe in the principles of the ------
Party, and intend to support its principles and policies; that I meet all the statutory
and constitutional qualifications for the office which I am seeking; that if nominated
as a candidate of such party at the ensuing election I will accept the nomination and
not withdraw for reasons other than those stated in KRS 118.105(3); that I will not
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
knowingly violate any election law or any law relating to corrupt and fraudulent
practice in campaigns or elections in this state, and if finally elected I will qualify
for the office."
The declaration shall be subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before an officer
authorized to administer an oath[ by the candidate and by the two (2) voters making
the declaration and signing the candidate's petition for office].
(3) When the notice and declaration has been filed with the Secretary of State or county
clerk, as appropriate, and certified according to KRS 118.165, the Secretary of State
or county clerk, as appropriate, shall have the candidate's name printed on the ballot
according to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in KRS 118.185.
(4) Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the filing papers and shall
not be printed on the ballots as part of the candidate's name; however, nicknames,
initials, and contractions of given names may be acceptable as the candidate's name.
Section 2. KRS 118A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 118A.100, no person's name shall appear on a ballot,
including an absentee ballot, for an office of the Court of Justice without first
having been nominated as provided in this section.
(2) Each candidate for nomination shall file a petition for nomination with the
Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in
November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the
ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January
preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary for the office. The petition
shall be sworn to[ before an officer authorized to administer an oath] by the
candidate before an officer authorized to administer an oath[ and by not less than
two (2) registered voters from the district or circuit from which he or she seeks
nomination]. The petition shall be signed by the candidate, but the candidate's
signature[Signatures for nomination papers] shall not be affixed on the document
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the
year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. The petition
shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the
last date on which the papers are permitted to be filed.
(3) (a) The petition for nomination shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board
of Elections. The petition shall include a declaration sworn to by the
candidate, that he or she possesses all the constitutional and statutory
requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Titles, ranks, or
spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the petition and shall not be printed
on the ballots as part of the candidate's name; however, nicknames, initials,
and contractions of given names may be acceptable as the candidate's name.
(b) The Secretary of State shall certify the exact spelling and form of the name of
the candidate to be printed on all ballots in accordance with the requirements
listed in KRS 118.129.
(4) The Secretary of State shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine
whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State shall
notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing. The
order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division if
divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the
office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following
the filing deadline for the primary as established in this section and in KRS
83A.045 and 118.165.
(5) Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(a) preceding the primary, and
after the order of names on the ballot has been determined as required in subsection
(4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in
the election of the various candidates, the name and place of residence of each
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
candidate for each office, by district or circuit, and numbered division if
divisions exist, as specified in the petitions for nomination filed with him or
her; and
(b) Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which
the names of candidates shall be printed and the order in which they are to
appear on the ballot.
(6) The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has
been designated by the Secretary of State.
(7) The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots for the
primary the names of the candidates for offices in the Court of Justice.
(8) The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or
columns or in a separate line or lines and identified by the words "Judicial Ballot."
The words "Vote for one," or "Vote for one in each division," shall be printed on
the ballot in an appropriate location. The office, numbered division if divisions
exist, and the candidates shall be clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem
of any kind, nor any sign indicating any candidate's political belief or party
affiliation, shall be used on the ballots.
(9) The two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for nomination for
justice or judge of a district or circuit, or numbered division if divisions exist, shall
be nominated. Certificates of nomination shall be issued as provided in KRS
118A.190.
(10) If it appears after expiration of the time for filing petitions for nomination that there
are not more than two (2) candidates who have filed the necessary petitions for a
place on the ballot in the regular election, no drawing for ballot position shall be
held and the Secretary of State shall immediately issue and file in the Secretary's
office certificates of nomination, and send copies to the candidates.
Section 3. KRS 118A.100 is amended to read as follows:
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
(1) Candidates for an unexpired term of a judicial office to be filled at a regular
election shall be nominated at the primary next preceding the regular election in the
manner prescribed in KRS 118A.060 if the vacancy occurs not later than the second
Friday in December preceding the primary. If the vacancy occurs on or after that
date, the election to fill the unexpired term shall be held in accordance with the
procedures described in this section and Section 152 of the Constitution of
Kentucky.
(2) Each candidate shall file a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not
earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year
preceding the year in which the election for the unexpired term will be held and not
later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed
by law for holding the regular election for the unexpired term, if the vacancy occurs
prior to the first Tuesday following the first Monday in June. If the vacancy occurs
after the first Tuesday following the first Monday in June, each candidate shall file
a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not later than the second
Tuesday in August preceding the day fixed by law for holding the regular election
for the unexpired term. The petition shall be sworn to by the candidate[ and by not
less than two (2) registered voters from the district or circuit from which he or she
seeks nomination], before an officer authorized to administer an oath. The petition
shall be signed by the candidate, but the candidate's signature[Signatures for
nomination papers] shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first
Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in
which the office will appear on the ballot. The petition shall be filed no later than 4
p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers
are permitted to be filed.
(3) The petition for nomination shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board of
Elections. The petition shall include a declaration sworn to by the candidate, that he
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
or she possesses all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for
which the candidate has filed. Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be
accepted on the petition and shall not be printed on the ballots as part of the
candidate's name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names
may be acceptable as the candidate's name.
(4) The Secretary of State shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine
whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State shall
notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.
(5) The order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division
if divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the
office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election for
those petitions for nomination required to be filed no later than the first Tuesday
following the first Monday in June. For those petitions for nomination required to
be filed no later than the second Tuesday in August, the order of names on the
ballot for each district and circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, shall be
determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of
State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the second Tuesday in
August preceding the regular election.
(6) Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215 and after the order of names on the
ballot has been determined as required in subsection (5) of this section, the
Secretary of State shall:
(a) Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in
the election of the various candidates, the name and place of residence of each
candidate for each office, by district or circuit, and numbered division if
divisions exist, as specified in the petitions for nomination filed with the
Secretary of State; and
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
(b) Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which
the names of candidates shall be printed and the order in which they are to
appear on the ballot.
(7) The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has
been designated by the county clerk.
(8) The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots, including
absentee ballots, for the regular election the names of the candidates for offices of
the Court of Justice.
(9) The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or
columns or in a separate line or lines and identified by the words "Judicial Ballot,"
and in a manner so that the casting of a vote for all of the candidates of a political
party will not operate to cast a vote for judicial candidates. The words "Vote for
one" or "Vote for one in each division," shall be printed on the appropriate location.
The office, numbered division if divisions exist, and the candidates therefor shall be
clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem of any kind, nor any sign
indicating any candidate's political belief or party affiliation, shall be used on any
ballot.
(10) The candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast at the regular election for
a district or circuit, or for a numbered division if divisions exist, shall be elected.
(11) A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with
KRS 21.580 shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office
during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS 21.580(1)(a)1., regardless of the
number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.
Section 4. KRS 118.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of KRS 118.125 shall not apply to any eligible person serving in the
Armed Forces of the United States while this country is at war. The name of such
person shall be printed on the official ballot of his or her party for an office for
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1203
which he or she is eligible in any primary election when an application has been
filed on his or her behalf by two (2) reputable electors of the party at whose hands
he or she seeks the nomination.
(2) The[Such] application shall be accompanied by a statement signed by the proposed
candidate authorizing the action of the electors.
(3) The application and the candidate's statement[, herein mentioned,] shall be filed in
good faith and with the proper officer at the proper time, as provided for other
candidates in primary elections.
(4) [The form of such application shall be similar to that of the affidavits required of
electors in behalf of other candidates as provided in KRS 118.125.
(5) ]Before such a successful candidate is given a certificate of nomination, he or she
shall file with the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides a statement
that during the campaign for the nomination he or she did not, and while a
candidate for the office will not, knowingly violate any election law or any law
relating to corrupt and fraudulent practice in campaigns or elections in this state,
and if elected will qualify for the office.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 12:38 PM Jacketed